apertium-hbs.hbs.metadix
    <pardef n="perf_ref_pu/stiti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>sti</l><r>sti</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__ref__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>st</l><r>stiti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>st</l><r>stiti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__im__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>sti</l><r>stiti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>sti</l><r>stiti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>stivši</l><r>stiti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="perf_iv_pu/stiti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>sti</l><r>sti</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__iv__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>st</l><r>stiti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>st</l><r>stiti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__im__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>sti</l><r>stiti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>sti</l><r>stiti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>stivši</l><r>stiti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="perf_iv_ukin/uti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__iv__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>uti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>uti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__em__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>uti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>uti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>uvši</l><r>uti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="perf_ref_ukin/uti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__ref__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>uti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>uti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__em__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>uti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>uti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>uvši</l><r>uti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="perf_tv_ukin/uti__vblex">
      <!--Infinuttve-->
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__tv__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>uti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__i__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l></l><r>uti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__em__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>uti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>uti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ut</l><r>uti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pp_sfx_extra__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>uvši</l><r>uti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="imperf_iv_š/iti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__iv__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__jem__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><p><l>ija</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ijući</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
<!--       <e><p><l>ijući</l><r>ijući<s n="vblex"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e> --><!--simple adverbs-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="imperf_ref_š/iti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__ref__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__jem__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><p><l>ija</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ijući</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ref"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
<!--       <e><p><l>ijući</l><r>ijući<s n="vblex"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e> --><!--simple adverbs-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="imperf_tv_š/iti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__tv__vblex__imperf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__jem__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Imperfect-->
      <e><p><l>ija</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="imperf__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>iven</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="pp_sfx_extra__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ijući</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
<!--       <e><p><l>ijući</l><r>ijući<s n="vblex"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e> --><!--simple adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="perf_iv_saš/iti__vblex">
      <!--Infinitive-->
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i</r></p><par n="inf_ti+fiiI__sfx__iv__vblex__perf"/></e>
      <!--Imperative-->
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="imp__sfx__j__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Present-->
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="pres__sfx__jem__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Aorist-->
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="aor__sfx__vblex"/></e>
      <!--Participles-->
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="lp_o__sfx"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ivši</l><r>iti<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e><!--verbose adverbs-->
    </pardef>

    <e lm="dotaknuti"><i>dotakn</i><par n="perf_iv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dotaknuti"><i>dotakn</i><par n="perf_tv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nametnuti"><i>nametn</i><par n="perf_tv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="šiti"><i>š</i><par n="imperf_tv_š/iti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="šiti"><i>š</i><par n="imperf_iv_š/iti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kriti"><i>kr</i><par n="imperf_iv_š/iti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kriti"><i>kr</i><par n="imperf_tv_š/iti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kriti"><i>kr</i><par n="imperf_ref_š/iti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="miti"><i>m</i><par n="imperf_tv_š/iti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="miti"><i>m</i><par n="imperf_ref_š/iti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="popustiti"><i>popu</i><par n="perf_iv_pu/stiti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izvijestiti"><i>izv</i><par n="e_ije__yat"/><par n="perf_iv_pu/stiti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kimnuti"><i>kimn</i><par n="perf_iv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="istaknuti"><i>istakn</i><par n="perf_tv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="istaknuti"><i>istakn</i><par n="perf_ref_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="krenuti"><i>kren</i><par n="perf_iv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skrenuti"><i>skren</i><par n="perf_iv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skrenuti"><i>skren</i><par n="perf_tv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ukinuti"><i>ukin</i><par n="perf_tv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="poginuti"><i>pogin</i><par n="perf_iv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="počinuti"><i>počin</i><par n="perf_iv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="obrnuti"><i>obrn</i><par n="perf_tv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="obrnuti"><i>obrn</i><par n="perf_ref_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prekinuti"><i>prekin</i><par n="perf_tv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prekinuti"><i>prekin</i><par n="perf_ref_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="opomenuti"><i>opomen</i><par n="perf_tv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="istaknuti"><i>istakn</i><par n="perf_ref_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spomenuti"><i>spomen</i><par n="perf_tv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spomenuti"><i>spomen</i><par n="perf_ref_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prekinuti"><i>prekin</i><par n="perf_ref_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pokrenuti"><i>pokren</i><par n="perf_tv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pokrenuti"><i>pokren</i><par n="perf_ref_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="potaknuti"><i>potakn</i><par n="perf_ref_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="umaknuti"><i>umakn</i><par n="perf_iv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="primaknuti"><i>primakn</i><par n="perf_tv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="primaknuti"><i>primakn</i><par n="perf_ref_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izmaknuti"><i>izmakn</i><par n="perf_ref_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="minuti"><i>min</i><par n="perf_iv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="jurnuti"><i>jurn</i><par n="perf_iv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="okrznuti"><i>okrzn</i><par n="perf_tv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="okrznuti"><i>okrzn</i><par n="perf_ref_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="buknuti"><i>bukn</i><par n="perf_iv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="otpočinuti"><i>otpočin</i><par n="perf_iv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="iščeznuti"><i>iščezn</i><par n="perf_iv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zamrznuti"><i>zamrzn</i><par n="perf_ref_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zamrznuti"><i>zamrzn</i><par n="perf_iv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nametnuti"><i>nametn</i><par n="perf_tv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nametnuti"><i>nametn</i><par n="perf_ref_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="poginuti"><i>pogin</i><par n="perf_iv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="počinuti"><i>počin</i><par n="perf_iv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="obrnuti"><i>obrn</i><par n="perf_tv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="obrnuti"><i>obrn</i><par n="perf_ref_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="okrenuti"><i>okren</i><par n="perf_tv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="okrenuti"><i>okren</i><par n="perf_ref_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="laknuti"><i>lakn</i><par n="perf_iv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="opomenuti"><i>opomen</i><par n="perf_tv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="opomenuti"><i>opomen</i><par n="perf_ref_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="umetnuti"><i>umetn</i><par n="perf_iv_ukin/uti__vblex"/></e>
